New York, session 2025-2026, A1052.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph b of subdivision 1 and paragraph b of subdivision 2 3 of section 54-l of the state finance law, as added by section 1 of 3 part J of chapter 57 of the laws of 2011, are amended to read as 4 follows: 5 b. "Eligible municipality" shall mean a county, city, town or village 6 in which a video lottery gaming facility is located pursuant to section 7 sixteen hundred seventeen-a of the tax law that is not located in a city 8 with a population equal to or greater than one hundred twenty-five thou- 9 sand. Beginning April first, two thousand twenty-five, "eligible munici- 10 pality" shall also include the Hamburg Central School District in the 11 town of Hamburg, county of Erie. 12 b. State aid payments made to an eligible municipality pursuant to 13 paragraph b of subdivision two of this section shall be used by such 14 eligible municipality to: (i) defray local costs associated with a video 15 lottery gaming facility, or (ii) minimize or reduce real property taxes, 16 or (iii) for an eligible municipality that is a school district, 17 increase support for public schools in such district. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01165-01-5